Utah statutes.
41-1a-903.   Leased motor vehicles -- Disclosure of odometer information.

(1) (a)  Before executing any transfer of ownership document, each lessor of a leased motor vehicle shall notify the lessee in writing that the lessee is required to provide a written disclosure to the lessor regarding the mileage.

(b)  This notice shall state that failure to complete or providing false information may result in fines, imprisonment, or both.

(2) (a)  In connection with the transfer of ownership of the leased motor vehicle, the lessee shall furnish to the lessor a written statement regarding the mileage of the motor vehicle.

(b)  This statement must be signed by the lessee and shall contain all of the information required by Section 41-1a-902 and in addition the name and  address of the lessee and the lessor.

(c)  The statement shall be signed and certified as to its truthfulness by the lessee.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

